pt-PT: Forma de molde/corte: Animal; Pássaro; Borboleta; Nuvem; Peixe; Floral; Frutado; Geométrico; Coração; Casa; Folha; Carta; Lua; Número; Redondo; Quadrado; Estrela; Sol; Árvore; Triangular; Vegetal; Veículo; Outro
de: Form/Schnittform: Tier; Vogel; Schmetterling; Wolke; Fisch; Blumenmuster; Frucht; Geometrisch; Herz; Haus; Blatt; Letter; Mond; Zahl; Rund; Quadrat; Stern; Sonne; Baum; Dreieckig; Gemüse; Fahrzeug; Sonstiges
vi: Hình dạng khuôn/cắt: Động vật; Chim; Con bướm; Đám mây; Cá; Hoa cỏ; Hoa quả; Hình học; Trái tim; Nhà; Lá cây; Letter; Mặt trăng; Số; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Ngôi sao; Mặt trời; Cây; Tam giác; Rau củ; Xe cộ; Khác
nb: Form/kuttform: Dyr; Fugl; Sommerfugl; Sky; Fisk; Blomster; Frukt; Geometrisk; Hjerte; Hus; Blad; Brev; Måne; Antall; Rund; Firkantet; Stjerne; Sol; Tre; Trekantet; Vegetabilsk; Kjøretøy; Annet
th: รูปร่างแบบที่หล่อออกมา/ส่วนตัด: สัตว์; นก; ผีเสื้อ; เมฆ; ปลา; ลายดอก; ผลไม้; ลายเรขาคณิต; หัวใจ; บ้าน; ใบไม้; จดหมาย; พระจันทร์; ตัวเลข; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ดาว; ดวงอาทิตย์; ต้นไม้; แนวสามเหลี่ยม; พืชผัก; ยานพาหนะ; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt formy/wycięcia: Zwierzęcy; Ptak; Motyl; Chmura; Ryby; Kwiatowy; Owoc; Geometryczny; Serce; Obudowa; Liść; Letter; Księżyc; Liczba; Runda; Kwadrat; Gwiazda; Słońce; Drzewo; Trójkątny; Warzywo; Pojazd; Inne
da: Støbeform/skåret form: Dyr; Fugl; Sommerfugl; Sky; Fisk; Blomster; Frugt; Geometrisk; Hjerte; Hus; Blad; Brev; Måne; Nummer; Rund; Firkant; Stjerne; Sol; Træ; Trekantet; Grøntsag; Køretøj; Andet
sk-SK: Forma/tvar rezu: Zviera; Vtáčik; Motýlikový; Oblak; Ryby; Kvetinový; Ovocie; Geometrický; Srdce; Dom; List; List; Mesiac; Číslo; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Hviezda; Slnko; Strom; Trojuholník; Zelenina; Vozidlo; Iné
ja: モールド/カットシェイプ: 動物; 鳥; バタフライ; 雲; 魚; フローラル; フルーツ; ジオメトリック; ハート; 家; 葉; レター; 月; 数字; ラウンド; スクエア; 星; 太陽; ツリー; 三角形; 野菜; 車; その他
pt-BR: Formato de molde/forma: Animal; Ave; Borboleta; Nuvem; Peixe; Floral; Fruta; Geométrico; Coração; Casa; Folha; Carta; Lua; Número; Redondo; Quadrado; Estrela; Sol; Árvore; Triangular; Vegetal; Veículo; Outro
hu: Öntőforma/kivágó alakja: Állat; Madár; Pillangó; Felhő; Hal; Virág; Gyümölcs; Geometriai; Szív; Ház; Levél; Betű; Hold; Szám; Kerek; Négyzet; Csillag; Nap; Fa; Háromszögletű; Növényi; Jármű; Egyéb
es: Forma del molde/corte: Animal; Ave; Mariposa; Nube; Pez; Floral; Frutal; Geométrico; Corazón; Casa; Hoja; Carta; Luna; Número; Redondo; Cuadrado; Estrella; Sol; Árbol; Triangular; Vegetal; Vehículo; Otros
it: Forma modellata/tagliata: Animale; Uccello; Farfalla; Nuvola; Pesce; Floreale; Frutto; Geometrico; Cuore; Casa; Foglia; Lettera; Luna; Numero; Rotondo; Quadrato; Stella; Sole; Albero; Triangolare; Verdura; Veicolo; Altro
fi: Muotoiltu/leikattu muoto: Eläin; Lintu; Perhonen; Pilvi; Kala; Kukikas; Hedelmällinen; Geometrinen; Sydän; Talo; Lehti; Kirje; Kuu; Numero; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Tähti; Aurinko; Puu; Kolmion muotoinen; Kasvis; Ajoneuvo; Muu
ru: Литая/вырубная форма: Животное; Птица; Бабочка; Облако; Рыба; Цветы; Фрукты; Геометрический; Сердце; Дом; Лист; Буква; Луна; Цифра; Круг; Квадрат; Звезда; Солнце; Дерево; Треугольный; Овощи; Транспортное средство; Другой
nl: Vorm vorm/snijvorm: Dier; Vogel; Vlinder; Wolk; Vis; Gebloemd; Fruit; Geometrisch; Hart; Huis; Blad; Letter; Maan; Nummer; Rond; Vierkant; Ster; Zon; Boom; Driehoekig; Groente; Voertuig; Andere
el: Σχήμα καλουπιού/κοπής: Ζώο; Πουλί; Κούμπωμα πεταλούδα; Σύννεφο; Ψάρι; Φλοράλ; Φρούτα; Γεωμετρικό; Καρδιά; House; Φύλλο; Γράμμα; Φεγγάρι; Αριθμός; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Αστέρι; Ήλιος; Δέντρο; Τριγωνική; Λαχανικό; Οχημα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika kalupa/reza: Žival; Ptica; Metulj; Oblak; Riba; Cvetlična; Sadje; Geometrijska; Srce; Hiša; List; Črka; Luna; Številka; Okrogla; Kvadratna; Zvezda; Sonce; Drevo; Trikotna; Zelenjava; Vozilo; Drugo
zh-CN: 铸模/切割形状: 动物; 鸟; 蝶式; 云朵; 鱼; 花型; 果类; 几何图形; 心; 房屋; 叶子; 信纸; 月亮; 数字; 圆头; 方形; 星型; 太阳; 树; 三角形; 植物; 车辆; 其他
cs: Tvar formy/řezu: Zvíře; Pták; Motýl; Mrak; Ryba; Květinový; Ovocný; Geometrický; Srdce; Dům; List; Letter; Měsíc; Číslo; Oválná; Čtvercová; Hvězda; Slunce; Stromový; Trojúhelníkový; Zelenina; Vozidlo; Jiné
en: Mold/Cut shape: Animal; Bird; Butterfly; Cloud; Fish; Floral; Fruit; Geometric; Heart; House; Leaf; Letter; Moon; Number; Round; Square; Star; Sun; Tree; Triangular; Vegetable; Vehicle; Other
hr-HR: Oblik kalupa/izreza: Životinja; Ptica; Leptir; Oblak; Riba; Cvijet; Voće; Geometrijski; Srce; Kuća; List; Slovo; Mjesec; Broj; Krug; Kvadrat; Zvijezda; Sunce; Stablo; Trokut; Povrće; Vozilo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на формоване/изрязване: Животно; Птица; Пеперуда; Облак; Риба; Флорален; Плодове; Геометрична; Сърце; Къща; Листо; Писмо; Луна; Номер; Кръгъл; Квадратен; Звезда; Слънце; Дърво; Триъгълна; Зеленчук; Превозно средство; Други
ko: 몰드/컷팅 모양: 동물; 새; 나비; 구름; 물고기; 꽃; 과일; 기하학; 하트; 집; 잎; 레터; 달; 숫자; 라운드; 스퀘어; 별; 해; 나무; 삼각형; 야채; 자동차; 기타
ro-RO: Forma matriței/tiparului de decupat: Animal; Pasăre; Fluture; Nor; Pește; Floral; Fructe; Geometric; Inimă; Casă; Frunză; Literă; Luna; Număr; Zale rotunde; Pătrat; Stea; Soare; Copac; Triunghiular; Vegetal; Vehicul; Altele
tr: Kalıp/Kesme şekli: Hayvan; Kuş; Kelebek; Bulut; Balık; Çiçek; Meyve; Geometrik; Kalp; Ev; Yaprak; Mektup; Ay; Sayı; Yuvarlak; Kare; Yıldız; Güneş; Ağaç; Üçgen şekilli; Sebze; Araçlar; Diğer
fr: Forme de moule/découpe: Animal; Oiseau; Papillons; Nuage; Poisson; Floral; Fruit; Géométriques; Cœur; Maison; Feuille; Lettre; Lune; Nombre; Rond; Carré; Étoile; Soleil; Arbre; Triangulaire; Légume; Véhicule; Autre
sv: Form på gjutform/kap: Djur; Fågel; Fjäril; Moln; Fisk; Blommig; Frukt; Geometrisk; Hjärta; Hus; Blad; Brev; Måne; Siffra; Rund; Fyrkantig; Stjärna; Sol; Träd; Triangulär; Grönsak; Fordon; Övrigt
lt-LT: Formos / Iškarpos pavidalas: Gyvūnas; Paukštis; Drugelis; Debesis; Žuvis; Gėlės; Vaisiai; Geometrinė forma; Širdelių forma; Medis; Lapas; Raidė; Mėnulis; Skaičius; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Žvaigždės formos; Saulė; Medis; Trikampis; Daržovė; Transporto priemonė; Kita
zh-TW: 模具/切割形狀: 動物; 鳥; 蝶式; 雲; 魚; 花卉; 水果; 幾何的; 心; 房子; 葉子; Letter; 月亮; 數位; 圓頭; 方頭; 星星; 太陽; 樹; 三角形; 植物; 車輛; 其他